California statutes. Insurance Code
(D) If the assuming insurer is an association, including incorporated and individual unincorporated underwriters, it shall have and maintain, on an ongoing basis, a minimum solvency or capital ratio in the reciprocal jurisdiction where the assuming insurer has its head office or is domiciled, as
 applicable, and is also licensed.

(4) The assuming insurer agrees to and provides adequate assurance to the commissioner, in the form of a properly executed Form RJ-1, as published on the department’s internet website, of its agreement to all of the following:

(A) The assuming insurer shall provide prompt written notice and explanation to the commissioner if it falls below the minimum requirements set forth in paragraph (2) or (3) or if any regulatory action is taken against it for serious noncompliance with applicable law.

(B) The assuming insurer shall consent, in writing, to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state and to the appointment of the commissioner as agent for service of process. The commissioner
 may require that consent for service of process be provided to the commissioner and included in each reinsurance agreement. This subparagraph does not limit, or in any way alter, the capacity of parties to a reinsurance agreement to agree to alternative dispute resolution mechanisms, except to the extent those agreements are unenforceable under applicable insolvency or delinquency laws.

(C) The assuming insurer shall consent, in writing, to pay all final judgments, wherever enforcement is sought, obtained by a ceding insurer or its legal successor, that have been declared enforceable in the jurisdiction where the judgment was obtained.

(D) Each reinsurance agreement shall include a provision requiring the assuming insurer to provide security in an amount equal to 100 percent of
 the assuming insurer’s liabilities attributable to reinsurance ceded pursuant to that agreement if the assuming insurer resists enforcement of a final judgment that is enforceable under the law of the jurisdiction in which it was obtained or a properly enforceable arbitration award, whether obtained by the ceding insurer or by its legal successor on behalf of its resolution estate.

(E) The assuming insurer shall confirm that it is not presently participating in any solvent scheme of arrangement which involves this state’s ceding insurers, and shall agree to notify the ceding insurer and the commissioner and to provide security in an amount equal to 100 percent of the assuming insurer’s liabilities to the ceding insurer, consistent with the terms of the scheme, if the assuming insurer enters into such a solvent scheme of arrangement.
 Security shall be in a form consistent with the provisions of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 922.41 and Section 922.5 and as specified by regulation. For purposes of this section, “solvent scheme of arrangement” means a foreign or alien statutory or regulatory compromise procedure subject to requisite majority creditor approval and judicial sanction in the assuming insurer’s home jurisdiction either to finally commute liabilities of duly noticed classed members or creditors of a solvent debtor, or to reorganize or restructure the debts and obligations of a solvent debtor on a final basis, and that may be subject to judicial recognition and enforcement of the arrangement by a governing authority outside the ceding insurer’s home jurisdiction.

(F) The assuming insurer shall agree, in writing, to meet the applicable information
 filing requirements as set forth in paragraph (5).

(5) The assuming insurer or its legal successor shall provide, if requested by the commissioner, on behalf of itself and any legal predecessors, the following documentation to the commissioner:

(A) For the two years preceding entry into the reinsurance agreement, and on an annual basis thereafter, the assuming insurer’s annual audited financial statements, in accordance with the applicable law of the jurisdiction of its head office or domiciliary jurisdiction, as applicable, including the external audit report.

(B) For the two years preceding entry into the reinsurance agreement, the solvency and financial condition report or actuarial opinion, if filed with the assuming
 insurer’s supervisor.

(C) Before entry into the reinsurance agreement, and not more than semiannually thereafter, an updated list of all disputed and overdue reinsurance claims outstanding for 90 days or more, regarding reinsurance assumed from ceding insurers domiciled in the United States.

(D) Before entry into the reinsurance agreement, and not more than semiannually thereafter, information regarding the assuming insurer’s assumed reinsurance by ceding insurer, ceded reinsurance by the assuming insurer, and reinsurance recoverable on paid and unpaid losses by the assuming insurer to allow for the evaluation of the criteria set forth in paragraph (6).

(6) The assuming insurer shall maintain a practice of prompt payment
 of claims under reinsurance agreements. The lack of prompt payment will be evidenced if one of the following criteria is met:

(A) More than 15 percent of the reinsurance recoverables from the assuming insurer are overdue and in dispute as reported to the commissioner.

(B) More than 15 percent of the assuming insurer’s ceding insurers or reinsurers have overdue reinsurance recoverable on paid losses of 90 days or more that are not in dispute and that exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each ceding insurer, or as otherwise specified in a covered agreement.

(C) The aggregate amount of reinsurance recoverable on paid losses which are not in dispute, but are overdue by 90 days or more, exceeds fifty
 million dollars ($50,000,000), or as otherwise specified in a covered agreement.

(7) The assuming insurer’s supervisory authority shall confirm to the commissioner on an annual basis, as of the preceding December 31 or at the annual date otherwise statutorily reported to the reciprocal jurisdiction, that the assuming insurer complies with the requirements set forth in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(8) This subdivision does not preclude an assuming insurer from providing the commissioner with information on a voluntary basis.

(b) The commissioner shall timely create and publish a list of reciprocal jurisdictions.

(1) A list of reciprocal jurisdictions is published through
 the NAIC Committee Process. The commissioner’s list shall include any reciprocal jurisdiction as defined under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), and shall consider any other reciprocal jurisdiction included on the NAIC list. The commissioner may approve a jurisdiction that does not appear on the NAIC list of reciprocal jurisdictions as provided by applicable law or regulation, or in accordance with criteria published through the NAIC Committee Process.

(2) The commissioner may remove a jurisdiction from the list of reciprocal jurisdictions upon a determination that the jurisdiction no longer meets one or more of the requirements of a reciprocal jurisdiction, as provided by applicable law, a process set forth in regulations issued by the commissioner, or in accordance with criteria published through the
 NAIC Committee Process, except that the commissioner shall not remove from the list a reciprocal jurisdiction as defined under subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). Upon removal of a reciprocal jurisdiction from this list, credit for reinsurance ceded to an assuming insurer that has its home office or is domiciled in that jurisdiction shall be allowed, if otherwise allowed pursuant Section 922.4, 922.41, or 922.5.

(c) The commissioner shall timely create and publish a list of assuming insurers that have satisfied the conditions set forth in this section and to which cessions shall be granted credit in accordance with this section. The commissioner may add an assuming insurer to the list if a NAIC accredited jurisdiction has added the assuming insurer to a list of assuming insurers or if, upon initial
 eligibility, the assuming insurer submits the information to the commissioner as required under paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) and complies with any additional requirements that the commissioner may impose by regulation, except to the extent that they conflict with an applicable covered agreement.

(1) If a NAIC accredited jurisdiction has determined that the conditions set forth in subdivision (a) have been met, the commissioner has the discretion to defer to that jurisdiction’s
 determination, and add an assuming insurer to the list of assuming insurers to which cessions shall be granted credit. The commissioner may accept financial documentation filed with another NAIC accredited jurisdiction or with the NAIC in satisfaction of subdivision (a).

(2) When requesting that the commissioner defer to another NAIC accredited jurisdiction’s determination, an assuming insurer shall submit a properly executed Form RJ-1, as published on the department’s internet website, and additional information as the commissioner may require. Upon receiving the request, the commissioner shall notify other states through the NAIC Committee Process and provide relevant information with respect to the determination of eligibility.

(d) If the commissioner
 determines that an assuming insurer no longer meets one or more of the requirements under this section, the commissioner may revoke or suspend the eligibility of the assuming insurer for recognition.

(1) While an assuming insurer’s eligibility is suspended, a reinsurance agreement issued, amended, or renewed after the effective date of the suspension shall not qualify for credit except to the extent that the assuming insurer’s obligations under the contract are secured in accordance with Section 922.5.

(2) If an assuming insurer’s eligibility is revoked, credit for reinsurance shall not be granted after the effective date of the revocation with respect to any reinsurance agreements entered into by the assuming insurer, including reinsurance agreements entered into before
 the date of revocation, except to the extent that the assuming insurer’s obligations under the contract are secured in a form acceptable to the commissioner and consistent with the provisions of Section 922.5.

(e) Before denying statement credit, imposing a requirement to post security with respect to subdivision (d), or adopting a similar requirement that will have substantially the same regulatory impact as security, the commissioner shall do all of the following:

(1) Communicate with the ceding insurer, the assuming insurer, and the assuming insurer’s supervisory authority that the assuming insurer no longer satisfies one of the conditions listed in subdivision (a).

(2) Provide the assuming insurer with 30 days from the initial
 communication to submit a plan to remedy the defect, and 90 days from the initial communication to remedy the defect, except in exceptional circumstances in which a shorter period is necessary for policyholder and other consumer protection.

(3) After the expiration of 90 days or less, as set forth in paragraph (2), if the commissioner determines that no or insufficient action was taken by the assuming insurer, the commissioner may impose any of the requirements of this subdivision.

(4) Provide a written explanation to the assuming insurer of any of the requirements set out in this subdivision.

(f) If subject to a legal process of rehabilitation, liquidation, or conservation, as applicable, the ceding insurer, or
 its representative, may seek and, if determined appropriate by the court in which the proceedings are pending, may obtain an order requiring that the assuming insurer post security for all outstanding ceded liabilities.

(g) This section does not limit or alter the capacity of parties to a reinsurance agreement to agree on requirements for security or other terms in that reinsurance agreement, except as expressly prohibited by Sections 922.1 to 922.9, inclusive, or other applicable law or regulation.

(h) Credit may be taken under this section only for reinsurance agreements entered into, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2021, and only with respect to losses incurred and reserves reported on or after the later of the date on which the assuming insurer has met all
 eligibility requirements pursuant to subdivision (a) and the effective date of the new reinsurance agreement, amendment, or renewal.

(1) This subdivision does not alter or impair a ceding insurer’s right to take credit for reinsurance, to the extent that credit is not available under this section, as long as the reinsurance qualifies for credit under Sections 922.1 to 922.9, inclusive.

(2) This section does not authorize an assuming insurer to withdraw or reduce the security provided under a reinsurance agreement, except as permitted by the terms of the agreement.

(3) This section does not limit or alter the capacity of parties to a reinsurance agreement to renegotiate the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 204, Sec. 2.   (AB 1140)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

922.43.

The actual costs and expenses incurred by the department in reviewing requests for accreditation or certification, trusts, or review of an assuming insurer that has its head office or is domiciled in and is licensed in a reciprocal jurisdiction, as determined by the commissioner pursuant to Section 922.425, and subsequent amendments established or maintained pursuant to Sections 922.1 to 922.7, inclusive, and subsequent reviews, shall be charged to and collected from the requesting reinsurer. If the reinsurer fails to pay the actual costs and expenses promptly when due, then the commissioner may deny the requests, may refuse to allow credit for reinsurance ceded to that reinsurer or group, or may revoke the reinsurer’s accreditation or certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 71, Sec. 4.   (AB 2049)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

922.5.

(a) An asset or a deduction from liability for reinsurance ceded by a domestic insurer to an assuming insurer not meeting the requirements of Section 922.4 shall be allowed in an amount not exceeding the liabilities carried by the ceding insurer to the extent of either of the following:

(1) The asset or deduction is not greater than the amount of funds held by the ceding insurer under a reinsurance contract with that assuming insurer as security for the payment of obligations thereunder and those funds are held in the United States under the exclusive control of the ceding insurer.

(2) The asset or deduction is not greater than the amount of funds held in a trust, satisfactory to the commissioner, on
 behalf of the ceding insurer under a reinsurance contract with the assuming insurer as security for the payment of obligations thereunder and is held in a qualified United States financial institution, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 922.7, subject to withdrawal solely by the ceding insurer.

The security under this subdivision may be in the form of cash or securities authorized as general investments under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1170) of Chapter 2, or securities listed by the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC, including those deemed exempt from filing, as defined by the Purposes and Procedures Manual of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Securities Valuation Office, qualifying as admitted assets under this code and with liquidity meeting the requirements of Section 706.5, and not otherwise disallowed in the commissioner’s discretion.

(b) An asset or a
 deduction from liability for reinsurance ceded by a domestic insurer to an assuming insurer not meeting the requirements of Section 922.4 shall be allowed in an amount not exceeding the liabilities carried by the ceding insurer to the extent that security is provided in the form of letters of credit, satisfactory to the commissioner, which shall be:

(1) Clean, irrevocable, unconditional letters of credit, issued or confirmed by qualified United States financial institutions, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 922.7, effective no later than December 31st in respect of the year for which filing is being made, and in the possession of the ceding insurer on or before the filing date of its annual statement.

(2) Letters of credit meeting applicable standards of issuer acceptability as of the dates of their issuance or confirmation and shall, notwithstanding the issuing or
 confirming institutions’ subsequent failure to meet applicable standards of issuer acceptability, continue to be acceptable as security until their expiration, extension, renewal, modification, or amendment, whichever first occurs.

(c) For purposes of this section, the phrase “deemed exempt from filing as defined by the Purposes and Procedures Manual of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Securities Valuation Office” shall mean all United States government securities, and all other securities or bonds with a rating of SVO 1 or FE 1 listed by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Securities Valuation Office as exempt.

(d) The commissioner may adopt, by regulation pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 922.85, specific additional requirements relating to or setting forth the valuation of assets or reserve credits, the amount and forms of security
 supporting reinsurance arrangements described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 922.85, and the circumstances pursuant to which credit will be reduced or eliminated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 202, Sec. 3.   (AB 938)   Effective September 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

922.6.

Credit for reinsurance shall not be denied a foreign ceding insurer to the extent that credit is recognized by the ceding insurer’s domestic state regulator, provided that the domestic state is accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC), or the domestic state regulator has financial solvency requirements substantially similar to the requirements necessary for NAIC accreditation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 277, Sec. 10.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

922.7.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 922.5, a “qualified United States financial institution” means an institution that complies with all of the following:

(1) Is organized or in the case of a United States office of a foreign banking organization, licensed, under the laws of the United States or any state thereof.

(2) Is regulated, supervised, and examined by United States federal or state authorities having regulatory authority over banks and trust companies.

(3) Has been determined by the commissioner, or, in the discretion of the commissioner, the Securities Valuation Office of the NAIC, to meet such standards of financial condition and standing as are considered necessary and appropriate to regulate the quality of financial institutions whose letters of credit will be acceptable to the commissioner.

(b) A “qualified United States financial institution” means, for purposes of those provisions of this law specifying those institutions that are eligible to act as a fiduciary of a trust, an institution that is both:

(1) Organized, or in the case of a United States branch or agency office of a foreign banking organization, licensed, under the laws of the United States or any state thereof and has been granted authority to operate with fiduciary powers.

(2) Regulated, supervised, and examined by federal or state authorities having regulatory authority over banks and trust companies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 840, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

922.8.

(a) The commissioner, after notice, comment period, and a hearing if requested by more than 10 affected insurers, may issue a bulletin setting forth reasonable requirements for the allowance of reinsurance as an asset or deduction from liability consistent with Sections 922.4 to 922.6, inclusive, including the following:

(1) Filing requirements for an accredited assuming insurer.

(2) Accreditation requirements for an assuming insurer with less than a twenty million
 dollar ($20,000,000) surplus as regards policyholders.

(3) The definition of “liabilities” as used in Sections 922.4 and 922.5.

(4) Investment guidelines for trust funds established and maintained pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 922.4.

(5) Definitions and required or permitted conditions for trust funds established and maintained pursuant to Section 922.5.

(6) Requirements of letters of credit established and maintained pursuant to Section 922.5.

(b) On or before January 1, 1998, the commissioner shall notify the Legislature that the bulletin has been
 promulgated so that the Legislature is able to ensure the commissioner’s compliance with the requirements of this subdivision.

(c) The bulletin authorized by this section shall have the same force and effect, and may be enforced by the commissioner to the same extent and degree, as regulations issued by the commissioner until the time that the commissioner issues additional or amended regulations pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) The commissioner shall adopt regulations implementing the provisions of this law, that shall supersede the bulletin authorized by this section, no later than December 31, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 277, Sec. 11.   (SB 1216)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

922.85.

(a) The commissioner may adopt regulations in accordance with the procedures provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code or otherwise prescribe requirements consistent with Sections 922.4, 922.41, 922.42, 922.425, 922.43, and 922.5, provided the commissioner may update subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) and subdivision (i) of Section 922.41 to add other nationally recognized statistical rating agencies, or to modify the rating categories, the corresponding financial ratings, or the percentage of security required to conform to changes in these factors adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC).

(b) (1) The commissioner may adopt
 regulations applicable to reinsurance arrangements described in paragraph (2).

(2) A regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision may apply only to reinsurance relating to the following:

(A) Life insurance policies with guaranteed nonlevel gross premiums or guaranteed nonlevel benefits.

(B) Universal life insurance policies with a provision resulting in the ability of a policyholder to keep a policy in force over a secondary guarantee period.

(C) Variable annuities with guaranteed death or living benefits.

(D) Long-term care insurance policies.

(E) Other life and health insurance and annuity products as to which the NAIC
 adopts model regulatory requirements with respect to credit for reinsurance.

(3) A regulation adopted pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (2) may apply to any treaty containing the following:

(A) Policies issued on or after January 1, 2015.

(B) Policies issued prior to January 1, 2015, if risk pertaining to those policies is ceded in connection with the treaty, in whole or in part, on or after January 1, 2015.

(4) A regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision may require the ceding insurer, in calculating the amounts or forms of security required to be held under regulations promulgated under this authority, to use the Valuation Manual adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 10489.96, including all amendments in
 effect on the date as of which the calculation is made, to the extent applicable.

(5) A regulation adopted pursuant to this subdivision shall not apply to cessions to an assuming insurer that satisfies any of the following:

(A) The insurer meets the conditions of Section 922.425 in this state or is operating in accordance with provisions substantially equivalent to Section 922.425 in a minimum of five other states.

(B) The insurer is certified in this state, or certified in a minimum of five other states.

(C) The insurer maintains at least two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) in capital and surplus when determined in accordance with the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual, including all amendments thereto adopted by the NAIC,
 excluding the impact of any permitted or prescribed practices, and satisfies either of the following:

(i) The insurer is licensed in at least 26 states.

(ii) The insurer is licensed in at least 10 states, and licensed or accredited in a total of at least 35 states.

(6) The authority to adopt regulations pursuant to this subdivision does not limit the commissioner’s general authority to adopt regulations pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 71, Sec. 5.   (AB 2049)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

922.9.

Sections 922.4 and 922.5 shall apply to all cessions on and after January 1, 1997, under reinsurance contracts that have had an inception, anniversary, or renewal date not less than six months after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 840, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

923.

The commissioner shall require every insurer which is required to file an annual or quarterly statement to use the statement blanks and instructions thereto for the appropriate year adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The statements shall be completed in conformity with the Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, to the extent that the practices and procedures contained in the manual do not conflict with any other provision of this code. The commissioner may make changes from time to time in the form of the statements and the number and method of filing reports as seem to him or her best adapted to elicit from the insurers a true exhibit of their condition. The commissioner shall notify each insurer of any changes from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ statement blanks which the commissioner has determined pursuant to this section to be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

923.5.

Each insurer transacting business in this state shall at all times maintain reserves in an amount estimated in the aggregate to provide for the payment of all losses and claims for which the insurer may be liable, and to provide for the expense of adjustment or settlement of losses and claims.

The reserves shall be computed in accordance with regulations made from time to time by the commissioner. The promulgation of the regulations by the commissioner, or any changes thereto or amendments thereof, shall be in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The commissioner shall make the regulations upon reasonable consideration
 of the ascertained experience and the character of such kinds of business for the purpose of adequately protecting the insured and securing the solvency of the insurer.

The commissioner may prescribe the manner and form of reporting pertinent information concerning the reserves provided for in this section.

This section shall not apply to life insurance, title insurance, disability insurance, mortgage insurance, or mortgage guaranty insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 2002)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

923.6.

(a) Every admitted property and casualty insurer, unless otherwise exempted by the domiciliary commissioner, shall annually submit the opinion of an Appointed Actuary entitled “Statement of Actuarial Opinion.” This opinion shall be filed in accordance with the appropriate Property and Casualty Annual Statement Instructions of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners (NAIC).

(1) For purposes of this section, the term, “property and casualty insurer” means any admitted insurer writing insurance as described in Section 102, 103, 105, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 118, 119, 119.6, 120, 124, or 124.5.

(2) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the same meaning as used in the Property and Casualty Annual Statement Instructions of the NAIC:

(A) Actuarial Opinion.

(B) Actuarial Opinion Summary.

(C) Actuarial Report.

(D) Appointed Actuary.

(E) Statement of Actuarial Opinion.

(F) Property and Casualty Annual Statement Instructions.

(3) The commissioner may adopt regulations related to the terms and conditions required by the Property and Casualty Annual Statement
 Instructions of the NAIC.

(b) Every property and casualty insurer domiciled in this state that is required to submit a Statement of Actuarial Opinion shall annually submit an Actuarial Opinion Summary, written by the insurer’s Appointed Actuary. This Actuarial Opinion Summary shall be filed in accordance with the appropriate Property and Casualty Annual Statement Instructions of the NAIC and shall be considered as a document supporting the Actuarial Opinion required in subdivision (a).

(c) An admitted insurer not domiciled in this state shall provide the Actuarial Opinion Summary upon request of the commissioner.

(d) An Actuarial Report and underlying workpapers as required by the appropriate Property and Casualty Annual
 Statement Instructions of the NAIC shall be prepared to support each Actuarial Opinion. If an insurer fails to provide either a supporting Actuarial Report or workpapers at the request of the commissioner, or if the commissioner determines that the supporting Actuarial Report or workpapers provided by the insurer are otherwise unacceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may engage a qualified actuary at the expense of the insurer to review the opinion and the basis for the opinion and prepare the supporting Actuarial Report or workpapers.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 7929.000 of the Government Code, subdivision (f), or any other provision of law, the Statement of Actuarial Opinion required by subdivision (a) shall be a public record and open to inspection.

(f) (1) Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the commissioner that are considered an Actuarial Report, workpapers, or Actuarial Opinion Summary provided in support of the Statement of Actuarial Opinion, and any other material provided by the insurer to the commissioner in connection with the Actuarial Report, workpapers, or Actuarial Opinion Summary shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be made public by the commissioner or any other person and are exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in any civil action brought by a private party.

(2) This subdivision shall not
 limit the commissioner’s authority to release the documents, materials, and other information described in paragraph (1) to the American Academy of Actuaries’ Actuarial Board for Counseling and Discipline (ABCD), or its successor, so long as those documents, materials, and other information are required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings, and the ABCD establishes procedures satisfactory to the commissioner for preserving the confidentiality of the documents, nor shall this subdivision limit the commissioner’s authority to use those documents, materials, or other information in furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as part of the commissioner’s official duties.

(3) The commissioner may also exercise, with respect to the documents, materials, or other information described in paragraph (1), all the
 authority specified in subdivision (b) of Section 735.5, or any successor provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 299.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

924.

The commissioner shall collect a late filing fee of seven hundred five dollars ($705) from any admitted insurer that fails to make and file in the commissioner’s office within the time prescribed by law any statements or stipulations required by this code. After the first month, the commissioner shall also collect a late filing fee of eight hundred forty-nine dollars ($849) for each and every month or fractional part of a month thereafter that the insurer continues to transact the business of insurance until those statements and stipulations are filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 16.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

925.

Upon request of the commissioner, and at intervals as prescribed by him or her, any insurer that appears to the commissioner to require immediate regulatory attention shall provide to the commissioner supplemental accounting, financial, and actuarial information. The commissioner may request that an insurer select and retain an independent certified public accountant, certified public accountant corporation, an actuary corporation, or an independent actuary satisfactory to the commissioner, if that person has not already been retained by the insurer, whenever the information supplied or likely to be supplied is not satisfactory or acceptable to the commissioner, or, whenever the person who would be responsible for that preparation of that information has previously provided information that was not satisfactory or acceptable to the commissioner. The commissioner may select or retain an independent certified public accountant, a certified public accountant corporation, an actuary corporation, or an independent actuary, if the insurer does not within a reasonable time make the selection as requested by the commissioner. If the information is prepared by an independent certified public accountant or independent actuary, or other independent professional financial corporation or person, the corporation or person shall examine and render an opinion upon that supplemental information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 948, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

925.1.

(a) All supplemental information, work papers and other relevant documents of the independent certified public accountant, or independent actuary, or other independent professional financial person and the insurer relevant to information provided to the commissioner pursuant to Sections 925 to 925.2, inclusive, shall be made available by the insurer for review by the commissioner upon request at the insurer’s office, at the commissioner’s office, or any other reasonable place designated by the commissioner.

(b) All supplemental information, relevant work papers and other relevant documents of the certified public accountant or actuary shall be retained for a period of not less than five years from the date of the report. The certified public accountant or the actuary shall make that information available to the insurer upon the reasonable request of the commissioner made to the insurer, except when that information is subject to the right against self-incrimination or other relevant privileges.

(c) Every insurer shall authorize, in writing, the independent certified public accountant, independent actuary, or other independent professional financial person retained or engaged by it to provide to the commissioner all information subject to Section 925 to 925.2, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

925.2.

The commissioner may prescribe the subject matter and form of reporting supplemental information and the subject matter of opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

925.3.

All supplemental information provided or made available to the commissioner pursuant to Sections 925 to 925.2, inclusive, including work papers and other relevant documents of the independent certified public accountants or, independent actuary or other independent professional financial person and the insurer relevant to that information, shall be received in confidence within the meaning of Section 7929.000 of the Government Code and exempt from the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Additionally, that information shall not be subject to subpoena or subpoena duces tecum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 300.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

925.4.

Nothing contained herein shall be deemed in any manner to limit, restrict or abridge the powers of the commissioner to examine insurers, to inquire into their financial condition or to obtain supplemental information in accordance with any other provision of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.1. California Insurance Community Investment [926. - 926.3.]

926.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is in the interest of all Californians that there is a strong and viable insurance market.

(b) It is the policy of this state that insurers should be supportive of investments that promote social, economic, and environmental benefits, and should consider making these investments with an emphasis on using diverse investment managers to the extent possible.

(c) This article shall establish the California Organized Investment Network (COIN) within the department.

(d) COIN has the responsibility to pursue active measures to encourage insurers to make investments that promote social, economic, and environmental benefits.

(e) COIN shall pursue active measures to encourage insurers to make investments, as defined in this article, including, but not limited to, creating and identifying potential investment opportunities, including the development of investment opportunity bulletins and marketing and outreach efforts. This information shall be published on the department’s internet website in investment opportunity bulletins. These opportunity bulletins help finance projects that address the state’s critical needs, particularly in underserved, low-to-moderate-income, and rural communities, as well as environmental needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.   (SB 655)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

926.1.

As used in this article, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Area median income” (AMI) means either of the following:

(1) The median family income for the metropolitan statistical area (MSA), if a person or geography is located in an MSA, or for the metropolitan division, if a person or geography is located in an MSA that has been subdivided into metropolitan divisions.

(2) The statewide nonmetropolitan median family income, if a person or geography is located outside an MSA.

(b) “Community development